Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 1

General Provisions

70-6-101. Enforcement authority — Inspection of game — Penalty for refusing to allow inspection — Regulations.

The executive director or the officers of the wildlife resources agency, or officers of any other state or of the federal government who are full-time wildlife enforcement personnel designated by the executive director, shall enforce all laws now enacted or that may hereafter be enacted for the propagation and preservation of all wildlife in this state, and shall prosecute all persons, firms and corporations who violate any of such laws. The executive director or officers of the agency shall seize any and all wild animals, wild fowl, wild birds, fishes, frogs and other aquatic animal life, or parts of such wildlife, that have been killed, caught, or taken at a time, in a manner or for a purpose, or that are in possession, or that have been shipped, transported, carried or taken in this state or brought into this state from another state, contrary to the laws of this state.

It is the duty of every person participating in the privileges of taking or possessing such wildlife as permitted by this title to permit the executive director or officers of the agency to ascertain whether the requirements of this title are being faithfully complied with, including the possession of a proper license.

Any person who refuses such inspection and count by any authorized officer of the state, or who interferes with such officer or obstructs such inspection or count commits a Class C misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

This section does not permit search or inspection of a person's dwelling, place of business, or interior of an automobile without a search warrant.

The commission is authorized to provide by duly promulgated regulations a system for issuing warning citations under such conditions as may be deemed proper.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 5 (Williams, § 5178.34); 1959, ch. 145, § 4; 1970, ch. 494, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-701; Acts 1990, ch. 891, §§ 22, 23; 2020, ch. 799, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (c), substituted “This section does not permit” for “Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit” and inserted “, or interior of an automobile”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 799, § 2. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Bribery of and solicitation of compensation by public servants, §§ 39-16-102, 39-16-104.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Game and Game Laws, § 3.

70-6-102. Each unlawful taking and device deemed separate offense — Penalty.

Each wild animal, wild bird, wild fowl, or fish caught, taken, killed, captured, destroyed, shipped, offered or received for shipment, transported, bought, sold or bartered, or had in possession, and each trap, snare, net or other device used or attempted to be used in violation of this title constitutes a separate offense and, unless a specific penalty is otherwise provided, is punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 52 (Williams, § 5178.81); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-702.

70-6-103. Penalties for violation of title.

The violation of any of the provisions of § 70-1-206, § 70-1-302(a) and (b), § 70-1-304(1), (2) and (4), § 70-1-305, § 70-1-306(c)-(h), § 70-1-307, § 70-1-308(a), § 70-2-206, chapter 3 of this title, § 70-4-105 or § 70-5-103, is a Class C misdemeanor.

The violation of any provisions of this title for which a penalty has not been expressly provided is a Class C misdemeanor, and in case of a corporation, every participating officer or agent, or both, of the corporation shall be guilty and punished as stated in this section.

Acts 1937, ch. 84, § 87-B, as added by Acts 1941, ch. 127, § 11; 1943, ch. 76, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.106; Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 71 (Williams, §§ 5176.87b, 5178.100); modified; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 42, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-703; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Violations indictable without prosecutor, § 40-13-104.

70-6-104. Trial for violations — Jurisdiction — Appeals.

When any person is arrested for any violation of the wildlife laws, it is the duty of the arresting officer making or causing the arrest to take the person so arrested before a court of general sessions for trial, in the county where the offense was committed. If before such court of general sessions, the accused is found guilty of any offense punishable by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less, that person shall have the right to appeal to the circuit or criminal court having jurisdiction of such appeals, upon giving security for the amount of the fine and imposed costs. In the cases of offenses punishable by a fine of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) or by imprisonment, then the magistrate or court of general sessions is governed by the general laws applicable to such offenses.

If the circuit court has concurrent jurisdiction with or as a criminal court in any county, then the circuit court shall likewise have jurisdiction over any offense for violation of any of the provisions of this title.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 69 (Williams, § 5178.98); 1957, ch. 382, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-704.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

70-6-105. Mistake of fact not a defense.

In any prosecution for the violation of any of the provisions of this title, it is not a defense that the person killing, taking, selling, shipping or storing any animals, fish or birds was mistaken as to its variety, sex, age or size, it being one of the purposes of this section to penalize recklessness resulting in the violation of this title's provisions.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 65 (Williams, § 5178.94); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-705.

70-6-106. Report and disposition of fines and forfeitures.

On or before the fifteenth day of each month, magistrates or clerks of general sessions and other courts shall make a detailed report of all fines and forfeitures collected during the previous calendar month, this report to be made on forms provided by the state wildlife resources agency. The county clerk, magistrates or clerks of general sessions courts shall retain ten percent (10%) of fines or forfeitures collected or taken, and shall pay one half (½) of the balance to the state treasurer with the report, to be placed to the credit of the wildlife resources fund, and shall pay one half (½) of the balance to the trustee of the county in which the fine or forfeiture was collected, to be placed to the credit of the general funds of the county.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 18 (Williams, § 5178.47); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 9; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-716.

70-6-107. Grand juries.

The grand juries of the several counties have and possess inquisitorial powers to inquire with respect to the different offenses mentioned in this title that are punishable by a fine of more than fifty dollars ($50.00), or by imprisonment.

It is the duty of the different judges of the criminal and circuit courts having jurisdiction of such matters to charge the provisions of this title to the grand juries of the different counties at each term of court in the respective counties.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 70 (Williams, § 5178.99); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-717.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.